Hawaii statutes.
§437D-19 Civil penalties. Any person
who violates or attempts to violate any provision of this chapter shall be
deemed to have engaged in an unfair and deceptive act or practice in the
conduct of trade or commerce within the meaning of section 480-2. [L 1988, c
251, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 59, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next